Tennessee, session 114, HB0249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (24).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Industrial development division, building finance committee, created by § 4-
14-108;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0249
000329
- 1 -